Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 5. PRODUCTION, PROCESSING, AND SALE OF HORTICULTURAL PRODUCTS

SUBTITLE F. HEMP

CHAPTER 121. STATE HEMP PRODUCTION PLAN

Sec. 121.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "hemp" means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds of the plant and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 764 (H.B. 1325), Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 121.002. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature that this state have primary regulatory authority over the production of hemp in this state.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 764 (H.B. 1325), Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 121.003. STATE PLAN. (a) The department, after consulting with the governor and attorney general, shall develop a state plan to monitor and regulate the production of hemp in this state. The plan must comply with:

(1) 7 U.S.C. Section 1639p;

(2) Chapter 122; and

(3) Chapter 443, Health and Safety Code.

(b) The department shall submit the plan developed under Subsection (a) to the secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture as this state's plan for monitoring and regulating the production of hemp as provided by 7 U.S.C. Section 1639p.

(c) If a plan submitted under Subsection (b) is disapproved by the secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture, the department, after consulting with the governor and attorney general, shall amend the plan as needed to obtain approval and submit an amended plan.

(d) The department shall, as necessary, seek technical assistance from the secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture and other state agencies in developing the plan under this section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 764 (H.B. 1325), Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 121.004. RULES. The department may adopt any rules necessary to implement and administer the state plan under Section 121.003.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 764 (H.B. 1325), Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 2019.